Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-4035
Business improvement district; dissolution; procedure.

The city council may dissolve a business improvement district by ordinance after a hearing before the city council. The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to dissolve the business improvement district at least fifteen days prior to the hearing required by this section. The resolution shall give the time and place of the hearing.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 21;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 228.
September 1, 2019